Missouri, session 2026, HB2497.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 348, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 348.182, to read as follows:
348.182. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authority", the Missouri agricultural and small business development
authority;
(2) "Beef producer", all beef producers who sell cattle;
(3) "Facility", any federally inspected facilities housing or processing cattle or
hogs;
(4) "Pork producer", all pork producers who sell hogs.
2. Subject to appropriation, the authority shall establish a meat production
justice grant program to provide incentives to beef and pork producers to adhere to
sustainable production practices that promote social, economic, and environmental
justice. The authority shall award grants to eligible beef and pork producers on the
basis of available funds with priority given to producers having the greatest need.
3. Any beef producer who maintains Beef Quality Assurance Certification for
staff and management and who is willing to enter into a grant agreement under the
terms outlined in subsection 6 of this section shall be eligible for a grant under the meat
production justice grant program to fund facility improvements and other facility or
operation needs to satisfactorily meet Beef Quality Assurance standards.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2497 2
4. Any pork producer who maintains Pork Quality Assurance (PQA) Plus
Certification for staff and management, receives PQA Plus site status, and who is willing
to enter into a grant agreement under the terms outlined in subsection 6 of this section
shall be eligible for a grant under the meat production justice grant program to fund
facility improvements and other facility or operation needs to satisfactorily meet Pork
Quality Assurance Plus standards.
5. The authority shall post on the authority's website the eligibility criteria
outlined in this section, the contents of the grant application, and the procedures and
timelines by which beef and pork producers may apply for grants.
6. The authority shall enter into a grant agreement with each beef or pork
producer to whom the authority awards a grant under this section. The grant
agreement shall be in writing and shall contain:
(1) A provision that the beef or pork producer agrees to maintain such
producer's certification from Beef Quality Assurance or Pork Quality Assurance Plus
for all staff for a continuous five-year period;
(2) A provision that the authority shall quarterly verify with the Beef Quality
Assurance or Pork Quality Assurance Plus programs that each producer is certified and
in compliance with the standards of each certificate;
(3) A provision that any obligations arising out of the agreement entered into
under this subsection are contingent upon funds being appropriated for grant
payments;
(4) A statement of the damages to which the state is entitled for the beef or pork
producer's breach of the grant agreement; and
(5) Such other statements of the rights and liabilities of the authority and of the
beef or pork producer not inconsistent with this section.
7. If a beef or pork producer breaches the written grant agreement by not
satisfactorily meeting all standards for certification required under subdivision (2) of
subsection 6 of this section, a corrective action plan shall be completed. Producers who
do not comply with the corrective action plan shall lose access to the grant program and
shall pay back all moneys such producers have received that fiscal year.
8. The department of natural resources shall notify the authority of a beef or
pork producer's violations of environmental laws or regulations and any citation for
such violations issued to such producer. Upon such notification, the authority shall
develop steps for the beef or pork producer to resolve such violations or correct such
citations under a corrective action plan as provided in subsection 7 of this section.

HB 2497 3
9. This section shall not be construed to require the authority to enter into grant
agreements with beef or pork producers who are eligible for grants under this section if
state moneys are not available for such purpose.
10. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Meat Production
Justice Grant Program Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the
general assembly. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The
fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be
used solely for awarding grants and administering the grant program as provided in
this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
11. The authority may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔